Maryland, session 2025, HB0716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
4–2901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 234 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) [(1)] “Public housing agency” means an entity authorized by the U.S.
Department of Housing and Urban Development to administer the federal Housing Choice
Voucher Program in the State.
[(2) “Public housing agency” does not include the Department.]
4–2902.
There is a Statewide Rental Assistance Voucher Program in the Department.
4–2904.
(a) (1) In political subdivisions without a local administrator under the federal
Housing Choice Voucher Program, the Department shall administer the State Program and
issue vouchers and housing assistance payments to assist low–income households that are
eligible for but are not currently receiving housing choice vouchers under the federal
Housing Choice Voucher Program.
(2) In political subdivisions with a public housing agency–administrator
under the federal Housing Choice Voucher Program, the public housing agency:
(I) shall administer the State Program and issue vouchers and
housing assistance payments to assist low–income households that are eligible for but are
not currently receiving housing choice vouchers under the federal Housing Choice Voucher
Program; AND
(II) MAY, SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
ADMINISTER THE STATE PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LOCAL
ADMINISTRATIVE PLAN OF THE PUBLIC HOUSING AGENCY.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROJECT–BASE UP TO 100% OF ITS
AUTHORIZED VOUCHER UNITS IF NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE STATE
PROGRAM, INCLUDING IN POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS WITHOUT A LOCAL
ADMINISTRATOR UNDER THE FEDERAL HOUSING CHOICE VOUCHER PROGRAM.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the State Program shall be
administered in accordance with federal guidelines under the federal Housing Choice
Voucher Program.
4–2906.
[The Department and each] EACH public housing agency shall [equally] prioritize
vouchers and housing assistance payments for families that include:
(1) a child who is under the age of 18 years;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 234
(2) a foster child who is:
(i) at least 18 years old; but
(ii) under the age of 24 years;
(3) a military veteran;
(4) an individual experiencing homelessness;
(5) a disabled individual; or
(6) an elderly individual.
4–2908.
(b) A family assisted under the State Program shall be expected to pay not more
than [30%] 40% of its monthly adjusted gross income for rent and utilities, as determined
by [the Department or] the public housing agency AT THE TIME THE FAMILY INITIALLY
RECEIVES ASSISTANCE UNDER THE STATE PROGRAM, EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE
PROVIDED IN THE FEDERAL HOUSING CHOICE VOUCHER PROGRAM.
4–2911.
(a) (1) [The Department or a] A public housing agency shall conduct [annual]
AN INITIAL INSPECTION AND PERIODIC inspections THEREAFTER of each unit rented
using housing assistance payments to ensure the continued compliance with federal
housing quality standards under 24 C.F.R. § 982.401 OR 24 C.F.R. § 5.703, AS
APPLICABLE.
(2) Inspections shall occur on or before the initial lease date and [each
year] AT LEAST BIENNIALLY thereafter IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PUBLIC HOUSING
AGENCY’S ADMINISTRATIVE PLAN.
(b) For a unit located in a building with 3 to 49 units, the property owner shall
provide [the Department or] the public housing agency with a certificate of occupancy that
has been completed within 1 year.
(c) For a unit located in a building with 50 units or more, the property owner shall
provide [the Department or] the public housing agency with an inspection certificate.
4–2919.
– 3 –

Ch. 234 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) For fiscal years 2025, 2026, and 2027, the Governor shall include in the
annual budget bill an appropriation of $10,000,000 to the Department for the State
Program.
(2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation sufficient to fund at least the same
number of vouchers issued in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Of the amount specified under subsection (a) of this section, the THE
Department shall distribute [6% THE GREATER OF THE FEDERAL DE MINIMIS RATE OF
THE PUBLIC HOUSING AGENCY’S MODIFIED TOTAL DIRECT COSTS AS ESTABLISHED
IN 2 C.F.R. § 200.414(F) OR 15% OF THE AMOUNT SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION] each year to [public housing agencies] EACH PUBLIC HOUSING
AGENCY OR AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE FEDERAL DE MINIMIS RATE OF THE PUBLIC
HOUSING AGENCY’S MODIFIED TOTAL DIRECT COSTS AS ESTABLISHED IN 2 C.F.R. §
200.414(F), WHICHEVER IS GREATER, to help defray staffing expenses related to the
administration of the federal Housing Choice Voucher Program and the State Program.
(c) The Department shall develop a formula for distributing State Program funds
to [the Department and] each public housing agency.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –